Utah statutes.
73-18a-4.   Marine toilets -- Pollution control devices required -- Rules
established by board.
(1)  Every marine toilet on a vessel used or operated upon the waters of this
state shall be equipped with an approved pollution control device in operative
condition.
(2)  The board shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, as provided in this chapter, establishing
criteria or standards for definition and approval of acceptable pollution
control devices for vessels.
